North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-10 General Rules of the Road
39-10-26.
Vehicle to stop or yield the right of way for authorized emergency vehicle or vehicle used for maintaining the state highway system — Penalty.

Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle displaying a visible flashing, revolving, or rotating blue, white, or red light, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right of way and shall immediately drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand edge or curb of the roadway clear of any intersection and shall stop and remain in that position until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a police officer.

If an authorized emergency vehicle is parked or stopped at the scene of an emergency and is displaying a flashing, revolving, or rotating blue, white, or red light, approaching traffic shall move to the right-hand edge or curb of the roadway and shall stop, but once having stopped, traffic may proceed past the scene at its own risk when the roadway is clear, except when otherwise directed by a police officer. If an authorized emergency vehicle is otherwise parked or stopped on the interstate system, or on a multilane highway outside the limits of a city, and the authorized emergency vehicle is displaying a flashing, revolving, or rotating amber, blue, white, or red light, the driver of an approaching vehicle shall proceed with caution and yield the right of way by moving to a lane that is not adjacent to the authorized emergency vehicle if the move may be made with due regard to safety and traffic conditions or if not, the driver shall proceed with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, and maintain a safe speed for the road conditions.

If a vehicle operated by or under the control of the director used for maintaining the state highway system is parked or stopped on the interstate system or on a multilane highway outside the limits of a city, and the vehicle is displaying a flashing, revolving, or rotating amber or white light, the driver of an approaching vehicle shall proceed with caution and yield the right of way by moving to a lane that is not adjacent to the vehicle if the move may be made with due regard to safety and traffic conditions or if not, the driver shall proceed with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, and maintain a safe speed for the road conditions.

This section does not operate to relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle or a vehicle operated by or under the control of the director used for maintaining the state highway system from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway.

Any individual who violates subsection 2 and causes an accident with an authorized emergency vehicle while the authorized emergency vehicle is displaying a visible flashing, revolving, or rotating amber, blue, white, or red light is guilty of an infraction.

An individual who violates subsection 3 and causes an accident with a vehicle operated by or under the control of the director used for maintaining the state highway system while the vehicle is displaying a visible flashing, revolving, or rotating amber or white light is guilty of an infraction.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 27; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1026; S.L. 1959, ch. 288, § 3; 1975, ch. 347, § 9; 1999, ch. 350, § 1; 2001, ch. 350, § 1; 2003, ch. 318, § 4; 2009, ch. 331, § 4; 2021, ch. 283, § 11, effective August 1, 2021.

Collateral References.

Construction and application of statutory provision requiring motorists to yield right-of-way to emergency vehicle, 87 A.L.R.5th 1.

39-10-26.1.
Highway construction and maintenance.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right of way to any authorized vehicle or pedestrian actually engaged in work upon a highway within any highway construction or maintenance area indicated by official traffic-control devices.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right of way to any authorized vehicle obviously and actually engaged in work upon a highway wherever such vehicle displays flashing lights meeting the requirements of section 39-21-28.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 10.

39-10-26.2.
Permitting use of vehicle to violate section 39-10-26 prohibited — Presumption of permission — Defense — Dual prosecution prohibited.

The registered owner of a motor vehicle may not permit that motor vehicle to be operated in violation of section 39-10-26. If a motor vehicle is seen violating section 39-10-26, it is a disputable presumption that the registered owner of the motor vehicle permitted that violation. It is a defense to a charge of violating this section that the registered owner of the vehicle was not operating the vehicle, if that registered owner identifies the person authorized by that owner to operate the motor vehicle at the time of the violation of section 39-10-26, or if that motor vehicle had been taken without the registered owner’s permission. A person may not be charged both with violating this section and with violating section 39-10-26. Violation of this section is not a lesser included offense of violation of section 39-10-26.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 343, § 2.

39-10-27.
Pedestrian obedience to traffic-control devices and traffic regulations.

A pedestrian shall obey the instructions of any official traffic-control device specially applicable to the pedestrian, unless otherwise directed by a police officer.

Pedestrians are subject to traffic-control and pedestrian-control signals as provided for in sections 39-10-05 and 39-10-06.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 28; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1027; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 11.

Collateral References.

Collision with pedestrian due to swaying or swinging of motor vehicle or trailer, 1 A.L.R.2d 167.

Liability for injury to pedestrian from vehicle moving from parking space, 29 A.L.R.2d 107.

Liability for injury to pedestrian incident to towing automobile as affected by contributory negligence, 30 A.L.R.2d 1019.

Stop-and-go signal, liability for collision of automobile with pedestrian at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of, 2 A.L.R.3d 155.

Signal or sign other than stop-and-go signal, liability for collision of automobile with pedestrian at intersection as affected by reliance upon or disregard of, 3 A.L.R.3d 557.

Failure to comply with statute regulating travel by pedestrian along highway as affecting right to recover for injuries or death resulting from collision with automobile, 45 A.L.R.3d 658.

Modern trends as to contributory negligence of children, 32 A.L.R.4th 56.

Who is “pedestrian” entitled to rights and subject to duties provided by traffic regulations or judicially stated, 35 A.L.R.4th 1117.

39-10-28.
Pedestrian’s right of way in crosswalk.

When traffic-control signals are not in place or not in operation, the driver of a vehicle shall yield the right of way, slowing down or stopping if need be to so yield, to a pedestrian crossing the roadway within a crosswalk when the pedestrian is upon the half of the roadway upon which the vehicle is traveling, or when the pedestrian is approaching so closely from the opposite half of the roadway as to be in danger.

No pedestrian may suddenly leave a curb or other place of safety and walk or run into the path of a vehicle which is so close as to constitute an immediate hazard.

Subsection 1 does not apply under the conditions stated in subsection 2 of section 39-10-29.

Whenever any vehicle is stopped at a marked crosswalk or at any unmarked crosswalk at an intersection to permit a pedestrian to cross the highway, the driver of any other vehicle approaching from the rear may not overtake and pass such stopped vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 29; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1028; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 28.

39-10-29.
Crossing at other than crosswalk.

Every pedestrian crossing a roadway at any point other than within a marked crosswalk or within an unmarked crosswalk at an intersection shall yield the right of way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Any pedestrian crossing a roadway at a point where a pedestrian tunnel or overhead pedestrian crossing has been provided shall yield the right of way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Between adjacent intersections at which traffic-control devices are in operation, pedestrians may not cross at any place except in a marked crosswalk.

No pedestrian may cross a roadway intersection diagonally unless authorized by official traffic-control devices; and, when authorized to cross diagonally, pedestrians shall cross only in accordance with the official traffic-control devices pertaining to such crossing movements.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 30; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1029; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 12.

39-10-30.
Driver to exercise due care.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter or the provisions of any local ordinance, every driver of a vehicle shall exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian and shall give warning by sounding the horn when necessary and shall exercise proper precaution upon observing any child or any confused, incapacitated, or intoxicated person.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 31; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1030; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 29.

Cross-References.

Care required in operating vehicles, see §§ 39-09-01, 39-09-01.1.

39-10-31.
Protection of blind or incapacitated pedestrians. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 25.

39-10-32.
Pedestrians to use right half of crosswalks.

Pedestrians shall move, whenever practicable, upon the right half of crosswalks.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 33; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1032.

39-10-33.
Pedestrian on roadway.

Where a sidewalk is provided and its use is practicable, it is unlawful for any pedestrian to walk along and upon an adjacent roadway.

Where a sidewalk is not available, any pedestrian walking along and upon a highway shall walk only on a shoulder, as far as practicable from the edge of the roadway.

Where neither a sidewalk nor a shoulder is available, any pedestrian walking along and upon a highway shall walk as near as practicable to an outside edge of the roadway, and, if on a two-way roadway, shall walk only on the left side of the roadway.

Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, any pedestrian upon a roadway shall yield the right of way to all vehicles upon the roadway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 34; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1033; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 13.

39-10-33.1.
Pedestrian’s right of way on sidewalk.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right of way to any pedestrian on a sidewalk.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 14.

39-10-33.2.
Pedestrian to yield to authorized emergency vehicles.

Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle making use of an audible signal by bell, siren, or exhaust whistle and displaying a visible flashing, revolving, or rotating blue, white, or red light, every pedestrian shall yield the right of way to the authorized emergency vehicle.

This section does not relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the highway nor from the duty to exercise due care to avoid colliding with any pedestrian.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 15.

39-10-33.3.
Blind pedestrian right of way.

The driver of a vehicle shall yield the right of way to an individual who is blind or visually impaired and carrying a clearly visible white cane or to an individual with a disability who is accompanied by an assistance dog.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 16; 2001, ch. 258, § 6.

39-10-33.4.
Pedestrian under influence of alcohol or drugs.

A pedestrian who is under the influence of alcohol or any drug to a degree which renders the pedestrian a hazard may not walk or be upon a roadway.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 17.

39-10-33.5.
Bridge and railroad signals.

No pedestrian may pass through, around, over, or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad grade crossing or bridge while such gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 18.

39-10-34.
Pedestrian soliciting ride or business.

No person may stand in a roadway for the purpose of soliciting a ride.

No person may stand in a roadway for the purpose of soliciting employment, business, or contributions from the occupant of any vehicle.

No person may stand on or in proximity to a street or highway for the purpose of soliciting the watching or guarding of any vehicle while parked or about to be parked on a street or highway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 35; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1034; S.L. 1963, ch. 264, § 9; 1975, ch. 347, § 19.

Collateral References.

Anti-hitchhiking laws, their construction and effect in action for injury to hitchhiker, 68 A.L.R.2d 300.

39-10-35.
Required position and method of turning.

The driver of a vehicle intending to turn shall do so as follows:

Right turns. Both the approach for a right turn and a right turn must be made as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the roadway.

Left turns. The driver of a vehicle intending to turn left shall approach the turn in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the direction of travel of such vehicle. Whenever practicable, the left turn must be made to the left of the center of the intersection and so as to leave the intersection or other location in the extreme left-hand lane lawfully available to traffic moving in the same direction as such vehicle on the roadway being entered.

The director and local authorities in their respective jurisdictions may cause official traffic-control devices to be placed and thereby require and direct that a different course from that specified in this section be traveled by turning vehicles, and when such devices are so placed, no driver of a vehicle may turn it other than as directed and required by such devices.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 36; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1035; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 20.

39-10-36.
Limitations on turning around.

The driver of any vehicle may not turn such vehicle so as to proceed in the opposite direction unless such movement can be made in safety and without interfering with other traffic.

No vehicle may be turned so as to proceed in the opposite direction upon any curve, or upon the approach to or near the crest of a grade, where such vehicle cannot be seen by the driver of any other vehicle approaching from either direction within five hundred feet [152.4 meters].

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 37; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1036; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 21.

Collateral References.

Automobiles: liability for U-turn collisions, 53 A.L.R.4th 849.

39-10-37.
Starting parked vehicle.

No person may start a vehicle which is stopped, standing, or parked unless and until such movement can be made with reasonable safety.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 38; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1037.

39-10-38.
Turning movements and required signals.

No person may turn a vehicle, move right or left upon a roadway, or merge into or from traffic unless and until such movement can be made with reasonable safety without giving an appropriate signal in the manner hereinafter provided.

A signal of intention to turn, move right or left, or merge into or from traffic must be given continuously during not less than the last one hundred feet [30.48 meters] traveled by the vehicle before turning, moving right or left, or changing lanes.

No person may stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle without first giving an appropriate signal in the manner provided herein to the driver of any vehicle immediately to the rear when there is opportunity to give such signal.

The signals required on vehicles by subsection 2 of section 39-10-39 may not be flashed on one side only on a disabled vehicle, flashed as a courtesy or “do pass” signal to operators of other vehicles approaching from the rear, nor be flashed on one side only of a parked vehicle except as may be necessary for compliance with this section.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 39; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1038; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 22; 2021, ch. 283, § 12, effective August 1, 2021.

39-10-39.
Signals by hand and arm or signal lamps.

Any stop or turn signal when required herein must be given either by means of the hand and arm or by signal lamps, except as otherwise provided in subsection 2.

Any motor vehicle in use on a highway must be equipped with, and required signals must be given by, signal lamps when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the left outside limit of the body, cab, or load of such motor vehicle exceeds twenty-four inches [60.96 centimeters], or when the distance from the center of the top of the steering post to the rear limit of the body or load thereof exceeds fourteen feet [4.27 meters]. The latter measurement applies to any single vehicle and to any combination of vehicles.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 40; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1039; S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 14; 1975, ch. 349, § 30.

39-10-40.
Method of giving hand-and-arm signals.

All signals herein required given by hand and arm must be given from the left side of the vehicle in the following manner and such signals must indicate as follows:

Left turn: hand and arm extended horizontally.

Right turn: hand and arm extended upward.

Stop or decrease speed: hand and arm extended downward.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 41; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1040.

39-10-41.
Obedience to signal indicating approach of train or other on-track equipment.

When a vehicle approaches a railroad grade crossing under any of the circumstances stated in this section, the driver of the vehicle shall stop within fifty feet [15.24 meters] but not less than fifteen feet [4.57 meters] from the nearest rail of such railroad, and may not proceed until the driver can do so safely. These requirements apply when:

A clearly visible electric or mechanical signal device gives warning of the immediate approach of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

A crossing gate is lowered or when a human flagman gives or continues to give a signal of the approach or passage of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

A railroad train or other on-track equipment approaching within approximately one thousand three hundred twenty feet [402.34 meters] of the highway crossing emits a signal audible from such distance and such railroad train or other on-track equipment, by reason of its speed or nearness to such crossing, is an immediate hazard; or

An approaching railroad train or other on-track equipment is plainly visible and is in hazardous proximity to such crossing.

A person may not drive a vehicle through, around, or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing while the gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed. A person may not drive a vehicle past a human flagman at a railroad crossing until the flagman signals that the way is clear to proceed.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 42; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1041; 2019, ch. 326, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Collateral References.

Failure of occupants of motor vehicle stalled on railroad crossing to get out and move to place of safety as contributory negligence, 21 A.L.R.2d 742.

Road vehicle running into train or car standing in highway crossing, contributory negligence of driver of, 84 A.L.R.2d 813.

Failure of signaling device at crossing to operate as affecting liability of railroad for injury, 90 A.L.R.2d 350.

Liability or recovery in automobile negligence action arising out of collision or upset as affected by operation of vehicle without front lights, or with improper front lights, 62 A.L.R.3d 560.

Liability or recovery in automobile negligence action arising out of collision or upset as affected by operation of vehicle without or with improper taillights or rear reflectors, 62 A.L.R.3d 771.

Liability or recovery in automobile negligence action arising out of collision or upset as affected by operation of vehicle without, or with improper, clearance, load, or similar auxiliary lights, 62 A.L.R.3d 844.

39-10-42.
All vehicles must stop at certain railroad grade crossings.

The department of transportation and local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdiction, are hereby authorized to designate particularly dangerous highway grade crossings of railroads and to erect stop signs thereat. When such stop signs are erected, the driver of any vehicle shall stop within fifty feet [15.24 meters] but not less than fifteen feet [4.57 meters] from the nearest rail of such railroad and shall proceed only upon exercising due care.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 43; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1042; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 31.

39-10-43.
Certain vehicles must stop at all railroad grade crossings.

The driver of a bus carrying passengers, or of a schoolbus, or of a vehicle carrying chlorine, empty or loaded cargo tank vehicles used to transport dangerous articles or any liquid having a flashpoint below two hundred degrees Fahrenheit [93.33 degrees Celsius], cargo tank vehicles transporting a commodity having a temperature above its flashpoint at the time of loading, certain cargo tank vehicles transporting commodities under special permits issued by the hazardous materials regulations board, and every motor vehicle which must have the following placards: “explosives”, “poison”, “flammable oxidizers”, “compressed gas”, “corrosives”, “flammable gas”, “radioactive”, or “dangerous”, before crossing at grade any track of a railroad, shall stop the vehicle within fifty feet [15.24 meters] but not less than fifteen feet [4.57 meters] from the nearest rail of the railroad and while stopped shall listen and look in both directions along the track for any approaching train or other on-track equipment, and for signals indicating the approach of a train or other on-track equipment and may not proceed until the driver can do so safely. After stopping as required and upon proceeding when safe to do so, the driver of the vehicle shall cross only in such gear of the vehicle that there will be no necessity for manually changing gears while traversing the crossing and the driver may not shift gears manually while crossing the track.

A stop is not required at a crossing if traffic is controlled by a police officer. For the purposes of this section, a United States marshal is considered a police officer.

A stop is not required at a crossing that the director has designated as an out-of-service crossing and which is clearly marked by signs bearing the words “Tracks out of service” or “Exempt” in conspicuous places on each side of the crossing.

The designation must be limited to use at a crossing where track has been abandoned or its use discontinued.

The director shall notify the road authority and any railway company of a crossing under the jurisdiction of that railway company which the director has designated as an out-of-service crossing under this section and the road authority shall erect signs bearing the words “Tracks out of service” or “Exempt” in conspicuous places on each side of the crossing.

All signs must conform to the manual on uniform traffic-control devices as provided under section 39-13-06.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 44; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1043; S.L. 1961, ch. 206, § 2; 1963, ch. 264, § 10; 1975, ch. 347, § 23; 1977, ch. 360, § 1; 1989, ch. 471, § 1; 1991, ch. 424, § 2; 2003, ch. 328, § 1; 2019, ch. 326, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

39-10-44.
Stop signs and yield signs.

Preferential right of way at an intersection may be indicated by stop signs or yield signs as authorized in section 39-07-03.

Every stop sign and every yield sign must be erected as near as practicable to the nearest line of the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, if there is no crosswalk, then as near as practicable to the nearest line of the intersecting roadway.

Except when directed to proceed by a police officer or traffic control signal, every driver of a vehicle approaching a stop intersection indicated by a stop sign shall stop before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, in the event there is no crosswalk, shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway.

The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign if required for safety to stop shall stop before entering the crosswalk on the near side of the intersection or, in the event there is no crosswalk, at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, then at the point nearest the intersecting roadway where the driver has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 45; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1044; S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 15; 1965, ch. 277, § 1; 1985, ch. 437, § 1.

39-10-45.
Emerging from alley, driveway, private road, or building.

The driver of a vehicle emerging from an alley, driveway, private road, or building within a business or residence district shall stop such vehicle immediately prior to driving onto a sidewalk or onto the sidewalk area extending across such alley, building entrance, road, or driveway, or in the event there is no sidewalk area, shall stop at the point nearest the street to be entered where the driver has a view of approaching traffic thereon.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 46; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1045; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 32.

39-10-46.
Overtaking and passing schoolbus.

The driver of a vehicle meeting or overtaking from either direction any schoolbus stopped on the highway shall stop the vehicle before reaching the schoolbus when there is in operation on the schoolbus the flashing red lights or the stop sign on the control arm specified in section 39-21-18, and the driver may not proceed until the schoolbus resumes motion, the driver is signaled by the schoolbus driver to proceed, or the flashing red lights and the stop sign on the control arm are no longer actuated.

Every schoolbus must bear upon the front and rear thereof plainly visible signs containing the word “SCHOOLBUS” in letters not less than eight inches [20.32 centimeters] in height. When a schoolbus is being operated upon a highway for purposes other than the actual transportation of children either to or from school or for a school-sanctioned activity, all markings thereon indicating “SCHOOLBUS” must be covered or concealed.

The operator of a schoolbus equipped with amber caution lights may activate those lights at a distance of not less than three hundred feet [91.44 meters] nor more than five hundred feet [152.4 meters] from the point where schoolchildren are to be received or discharged from the bus.

Every schoolbus must be equipped with a stop sign on a control arm and red visual signals meeting the requirements of section 39-21-18, which may only be actuated by the driver of the schoolbus whenever the vehicle is stopped on the highway to receive or discharge schoolchildren.

The driver of a vehicle upon a highway with separate roadways need not stop upon meeting or passing a schoolbus which is on a different roadway or when upon a controlled-access highway and the schoolbus is stopped in a loading zone which is a part of or adjacent to such highway and where pedestrians are not permitted to cross the roadway.

Every schoolbus must bear on the rear of the bus a plainly visible sign containing the words “THIS SCHOOLBUS STOPS AT ALL RAILROAD CROSSINGS”.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 47; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1046; S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 16; 1975, ch. 349, § 33; 1983, ch. 439, § 1; 1987, ch. 473, § 1; 1989, ch. 471, § 2; 1997, ch. 341, § 1.

Note.

Section 5 of chapter 473, S.L. 1987, provides that the act does not require the installation of stop signs on control arms on schoolbuses in use before July 1, 1988.

39-10-46.1.
Permitting use of vehicle to violate section 39-10-46 prohibited — Presumption of permission — Defense — Dual prosecution prohibited.

The registered owner of a motor vehicle may not permit that motor vehicle to be operated in violation of section 39-10-46. If a motor vehicle is seen violating section 39-10-46, it is a disputable presumption that the registered owner of the motor vehicle permitted that violation. It is a defense to a charge of violating this section that the registered owner of the vehicle was not operating the vehicle, if that registered owner identifies the person authorized by that owner to operate the motor vehicle at the time of the violation of section 39-10-46, or if that motor vehicle had been taken without the registered owner’s permission. A person may not be charged both with violating this section and with violating section 39-10-46. Violation of this section is not a lesser included offense of violation of section 39-10-46.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 474, § 1; 1995, ch. 376, § 2.

39-10-47.
Stopping, standing, or parking outside of business or residence districts.

An individual may not stop, park, or leave standing any vehicle, whether attended or unattended, upon the paved or main-traveled part of any highway if it is practicable to stop, park, or so leave the vehicle off the paved or main-traveled part of the highway. There must be an unobstructed width of the highway of not less than twelve feet [3.66 meters] opposite a standing vehicle left for the free passage of other vehicles and a clear view of any stopped vehicle must be available from a distance of not less than two hundred feet [60.96 meters] in each direction upon the highway.

Unless the vehicle is blocking the highway or is otherwise endangering public safety, this section and sections 39-10-49 and 39-10-50 do not apply to the driver of a vehicle which is disabled while on the paved or main-traveled portion of a highway, if stopping and temporarily leaving the disabled vehicle is unavoidable.

Without the consent of the owner or driver of a vehicle and if a vehicle or any personal property or cargo spilled from the vehicle is blocking the highway or is otherwise endangering public safety, a police officer may:

Remove the vehicle or cause the vehicle to be removed from the highway; and

Remove or cause to be removed any personal property or cargo that may have been spilled from the vehicle onto the highway.

If reasonable care is used in the removal process, a police officer and the police officer’s employing agency, the department of transportation or an employee of the department of transportation, or a political subdivision or employee of a political subdivision authorized by a police officer is not liable in civil damages for loss or damage to any vehicle or to any personal property or cargo that may have spilled from a vehicle that is removed from a highway under this section.

The decision and method used to remove a vehicle or any personal property, or cause a vehicle or any personal property to be removed, is a discretionary decision under this section. In the event of a public necessity, a police officer, an employee of the department of transportation, or an employee of a political subdivision authorized by a police officer may take an action that may damage a vehicle or property removed under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 48; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1047; S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 4; 2015, ch. 272, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 272, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

39-10-48.
Officer authorized to remove illegally stopped vehicle.

If a police officer finds a vehicle standing upon a highway in violation of section 39-10-47, the officer may remove the vehicle or require the driver or other person in charge of the vehicle to move the vehicle to a position off the paved or main-traveled part of the highway to a place where the vehicle does not block the highway or otherwise endanger public safety.

If a police officer finds a vehicle unattended upon any highway and the vehicle may obstruct traffic or otherwise endanger public safety, the officer may have the vehicle moved to a location where it may be securely held.

A police officer may remove or cause to be removed any vehicle found upon a highway and move the vehicle to any location where the vehicle may be securely held if:

A report has been made the vehicle has been stolen or taken without the consent of its owner;

The owner or driver of the vehicle is unable to provide for its custody or removal; or

The individual driving or in control of the vehicle is arrested for an offense and taken into custody and another individual is not available to lawfully operate the vehicle.

If a police officer finds a vehicle standing, stopped, or parked in a dangerous location or in violation of any official traffic-control device prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of any vehicle on state property, the officer shall place a written warning on the vehicle for the first offense and issue a traffic citation for a subsequent violation. However, a traffic citation may not be issued for a violation of this subsection occurring on the state capitol grounds during a legislative session.

A police officer and the police officer’s employing agency, the department of transportation or an employee of the department of transportation, or a political subdivision or employee of a political subdivision authorized by a police officer is not liable in civil damages for loss or damage to any vehicle removed from a highway or state property under this section, so long as reasonable care is used in the removal process.

The decision and method used to remove a vehicle or any personal property, or cause a vehicle or any personal property to be removed, is a discretionary decision under this section. In the event of a public necessity, a police officer, an employee of the department of transportation, or an employee of a political subdivision authorized by a police officer may take an action that may damage a vehicle or property removed under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 49; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1048; S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 5; 1981, ch. 379, § 4; 2015, ch. 272, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 272, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Collateral References.

State or municipal towing, impounding, or destruction of motor vehicles parked or abandoned on streets or highways, 32 A.L.R.4th 728.

39-10-49.
Stopping, standing, or parking prohibited in specified places.

No person may stop, stand, or park a vehicle, except when necessary to avoid conflict with other traffic or in compliance with law or the directions of a police officer or traffic-control device, in any of the following places:

On a sidewalk.

In front of a public or private driveway.

Within an intersection.

Within ten feet [3.05 meters] of a fire hydrant.

On a crosswalk.

Within ten feet [3.05 meters] of a crosswalk at an intersection.

Within fifteen feet [4.57 meters] upon the approach to any flashing beacon, stop sign, or traffic-control signal located at the side of a roadway.

Between a safety zone and the adjacent curb or within fifteen feet [4.57 meters] of points on the curb immediately opposite the ends of a safety zone, unless the department or local authority indicates a different length by signs or markings.

Within fifteen feet [4.57 meters] of the nearest rail of a railroad crossing.

Within twenty feet [6.10 meters] of the driveway entrance to any fire station and on the side of a street opposite the entrance to any fire station within seventy-five feet [22.86 meters] of said entrance when properly signposted.

Alongside or opposite any street excavation or obstruction when stopping, standing, or parking would obstruct traffic.

On the roadway side of any vehicle stopped or parked at the edge or curb of a street.

Upon any bridge or other elevated structure upon a highway or within a highway tunnel.

At any place where official signs prohibit stopping.

No person shall move a vehicle not lawfully under the person’s control into any such prohibited area or away from a curb such distance as is unlawful.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 50; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1049.

39-10-50.
Additional parking regulations.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a two-way roadway must be so stopped or parked with the right-hand wheels of such vehicle parallel to and within twelve inches [30.48 centimeters] of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder.

Except where otherwise provided by local ordinance, every vehicle stopped or parked upon a one-way roadway must be so stopped or parked parallel to the curb or edge of the roadway, in the direction of authorized traffic movement, with its right-hand wheels within twelve inches [30.48 centimeters] of the right-hand curb or as close as practicable to the right edge of the right-hand shoulder, or with its left-hand wheels within twelve inches [30.48 centimeters] of the left-hand curb or as close as practicable to the left edge of the left-hand shoulder.

Local authorities may by ordinance permit angle parking on any roadway, except that angle parking is not permitted on any federal-aid or state highway without first obtaining the written authorization of the director.

The department with respect to highways under its jurisdiction may place official traffic-control devices prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles on any highway where in its opinion such stopping, standing, or parking is dangerous to those using the highway or where the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles would unduly interfere with the free movement of traffic thereon. No person may stop, stand, or park any vehicle in violation of the restrictions indicated by such devices.

The department, with respect to streets, roadways, and parking areas of any state charitable or penal institution and on the state capitol grounds, may authorize the purchase and placement by the supervisory agency of official traffic-control devices prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles. The placement of signs pursuant to this section must be done when, in the department’s opinion, the stopping, standing, or parking is dangerous or would unduly interfere with the free movement of traffic, especially the free flow of traffic required for proper fire protection. No person may stop, stand, or park any vehicle in violation of the restriction indicated by any official traffic-control device. Any registered owner must be presumed to have been the operator of a vehicle that is parked in violation of any official traffic-control device prohibiting or restricting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles on any highway, state charitable or penal institution property, or on the state capitol grounds. This presumption may be rebutted by a showing of clear and convincing evidence to the contrary. However, no traffic citation may be issued for a violation of this subsection occurring on the state capitol grounds during a legislative session, except that a written warning must be placed on any vehicle for such a violation.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 51; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1050; S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 6; 1981, ch. 379, § 5; 1991, ch. 592, § 13.

Collateral References.

Construction and effect in civil actions of statute, ordinance, or regulation requiring vehicles to be stopped or parked parallel with, and within certain distances of, curb, 17 A.L.R.2d 582.